North Dakota statutes. TITLE 47 Property
CHAPTER 47-16 Leasing of Real Property
47-16-27.
Right of tenant.

A tenant for years or at will, unless the tenant is a wrongdoer by holding over, may:

Occupy the buildings.

Take the annual products of the soil.

Work mines and quarries open at the commencement of the tenant’s tenancy.

Cultivate and harvest the crops growing at the end of the tenant’s tenancy.

The tenant has no rights to the property other than such as are given the tenant by the agreement or instrument by which the tenant’s tenancy is acquired or by the provisions of this section.

Source:

Civ. C. 1877, §§ 257, 258; R.C. 1895, §§ 3364, 3365; R.C. 1899, §§ 3364, 3365; R.C. 1905, §§ 4800, 4801; C.L. 1913, §§ 5343, 5344; R.C. 1943, § 47-1627.

Derivation:

Cal. Civ. C., 819, 820.

Cross-References.

Mineral leases, specification of minerals to be leased, see N.D.C.C. § 47-10-24.

Products during lease belong to lessee, see N.D.C.C. § 47-16-04.

47-16-28.
Succession to rights in real property or rent transfers.

A person to whom any real property is transferred or devised upon which rent has been reserved, or to whom any such rent is transferred, is entitled to the same remedies for recovery of rent, for nonperformance of any of the terms of the lease or for any waste or cause of forfeiture as that person’s grantor or devisor might have had.

Source:

Civ. C. 1877, § 259; R.C. 1895, § 3366; R.C. 1899, § 3366; R.C. 1905, § 4802; C.L. 1913, § 5345; R.C. 1943, § 47-1628.

Derivation:

Cal. Civ. C., 821.

47-16-29.
Remedies against assignees of lessor.

Whatever remedies the lessee of any real property may have against the lessee’s immediate lessor for the breach of any agreement in the lease, the lessee may have against the assigns of the lessor. The assigns of the lessee may have remedies against the lessor and the lessor’s assigns except upon covenants against encumbrances or relating to the title or possession of the premises.

Source:

Civ. C. 1877, § 260; R.C. 1895, § 3367; R.C. 1899, § 3367; R.C. 1905, § 4803; C.L. 1913, § 5346; R.C. 1943, § 47-1629.

Derivation:

Cal. Civ. C., 822, 823.

Collateral References.

Sublessee’s rights with respect to primary lessee’s option to renew lease, 39 A.L.R.4th 824.

47-16-30.
Remedies against assignees of lessee.

Whatever remedies the lessor of any real property has against the lessor’s immediate lessee for the breach of an agreement in the lease or for recovery of the possession, the lessor also has against the assignees of the lessee for any claim for relief accruing while they are such assignees, except when the assignment is made by way of security for a loan and is not accompanied by possession of the premises.

Source:

Civ. C. 1877, § 260; R.C. 1895, § 3367; R.C. 1899, § 3367; R.C. 1905, § 4803; C.L. 1913, § 5346; R.C. 1943, § 47-1630; S.L. 1985, ch. 82, § 118.

Derivation:

Cal. Civ. C., 822, 823.

Collateral References.

Sublessee’s obligation to sublessor to perform latter’s covenants in original lease, 24 A.L.R.2d 707.

Relative rights and liabilities of landlord, tenant, assignee, or sublessee where act is done increasing insurance rates, 30 A.L.R.2d 489.

Effect of assignment or sublease on obligations of lessee under provision for landlord’s receipt of percentage of lessee’s profits or receipts, 38 A.L.R.2d 1113, 1117.

Calculation of rental under commercial percentage lease, 58 A.L.R.3d 384.

Sublessee’s rights with respect to primary lessee’s option to renew lease, 39 A.L.R.4th 824.

Merger or consolidation of corporate lessee as breach of clause in lease prohibiting, conditioning, or restricting assignment or sublease, 39 A.L.R.4th 879.

47-16-30.1.
Abandoned property — Disposal by lessor.

Property with a total estimated value of not more than two thousand five hundred dollars which is left on the premises of a leased dwelling may be retained by the lessor and disposed of without legal process twenty-eight or more days after the lessor received actual notice that the lessee has vacated the premises or twenty-eight or more days after it reasonably appears to the lessor that the lessee has vacated the premises. The lessor is entitled to the proceeds from the sale of the property. The lessor may recover, from the lessee’s security deposit, any storage and moving expenses in excess of the proceeds from the sale incurred in disposing of the property. If the lessor removes the abandoned property from the dwelling unit after a judgment of eviction has been obtained and the special execution has been served, the lessor has a lien upon the property for the reasonable amount of any storage and moving expenses and may retain possession of the property until the charges have been paid. The lien does not have priority over a prior perfected security interest in the property.

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 506, § 2; 1985, ch. 507, § 3; 1995, ch. 438, § 1; 1997, ch. 390, § 1; 2013, ch. 349, § 1.

Effective Date.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 349, S.L. 2013 became effective August 1, 2013.

47-16-31.
Gas and oil lease cancellation — When owner makes application. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1953, ch. 277, § 4.

47-16-32.
Application for cancellation of gas and oil lease — Contents. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1953, ch. 277, § 4.

47-16-33.
Notice of cancellation issued by recorder upon filing application. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1953, ch. 277, § 4.

47-16-34.
Appearance in district court — Lessee or assignee. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1953, ch. 277, § 4.

47-16-35.
No appearance in district court — Lessee or assignee. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1953, ch. 277, § 4.

47-16-36.
Duty of lessee to have terminated or forfeited lease released — Publication notice — Satisfaction of lease to be recorded — Notice to real property owner — Remedies.

When any oil, gas, or other mineral lease given on real property situated in any county of North Dakota and recorded therein terminates or is forfeited it is the duty of the lessee, the lessee’s successors or assigns, within fifteen days after the date of the termination or forfeiture of any lease, to have the lease surrendered in writing, the surrender to be signed by the party making the same, acknowledged, and placed on record in the county where the leased real property is situated without cost to the owner thereof. If the lessee, the lessee’s successors or assigns, fails or neglects to execute and record the surrender within the time provided for, then the owner of the real property may serve upon the lessee, the lessee’s successors or assigns of record, in person or by registered or certified mail, at the lessee’s last-known address, or if the post-office address is not shown of record then by publication once a week for three consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the county where the real property is situated, a notice in writing in substantially the following form:

To : I, the undersigned, owner of the following described land situated in County, North Dakota: (description of land) upon which a lease dated , , was given to notify you that the lease has terminated or become forfeited by breach of the terms thereof, that I elect to declare and do declare the lease forfeited and void and that, unless you do, within twenty days from this date, notify the recorder of the county as provided by law that the lease has not been forfeited, I will file with the recorder a satisfaction of lease as provided by law, and I demand that you execute or have executed a proper surrender of the lease and that you put the same of record in the office of the recorder of the county within twenty days from this date. Dated , .

Click to view

The owner of the real property may after twenty days from the date of service, registration, or first publication of the notice, file with the recorder of the county where the real property is situated a satisfaction of lease setting forth that the affiant is the owner of the real property, that the lease has terminated or that the lessee, or the lessee’s successors or assigns, has failed or neglected to comply with the terms of the lease, reciting the facts constituting the failure and that the same has been forfeited and is void, and setting out in satisfaction of lease a copy of the notice served, as above provided and the manner and time of the service thereof. If the lessee, the lessee’s successors or assigns, gives notice in writing within twenty days after service to the recorder of the county where the real property is located that the lease has not been forfeited and that the lessee, the lessee’s successors or assigns, still claim that the lease is in full force and effect, then the satisfaction of lease may not be recorded but the recorders shall notify the owner of the real property of the action of the lessee, the lessee’s successors or assigns, and the owner of the real property is entitled to the remedies now provided by law for the cancellation of the disputed lease. If the lessee, the lessee’s successors or assigns, fails to notify the recorder, as above provided, then the recorder shall record the satisfaction of lease and thereafter the record of the lease is not notice to the public of the existence of the lease or of any interest therein, or rights thereunder, and the record may not be received in evidence in any court of the state on behalf of the lessee, the lessee’s successors or assigns, against the lessor, the lessor’s successors or assigns.

Source:

S.L. 1951, ch. 233, § 1; 1953, ch. 277, § 1; 1955, ch. 290, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 47-1636; S.L. 1977, ch. 430, § 1; 1981, ch. 465, § 1; 1999, ch. 51, § 23; 2001, ch. 120, § 1.

Cross-References.

Drilling or mining leases by county, see N.D.C.C. § 11-27-05.

Oil, gas and mineral leases, publicly owned land, see N.D.C.C. chs. 38-09 and 38-11.

47-16-37.
Action to obtain release — Damages, costs, and attorney’s fees — Attachment.

Should the owner of such lease neglect or refuse to execute a release, then the owner of the leased premises may sue in any court of competent jurisdiction to obtain such release, and may also recover in such action of the lessee, the lessee’s successors or assigns, the sum of one hundred dollars as damages, and all costs, together with a reasonable attorney’s fee for preparing and prosecuting the suit, and may also recover any additional damages that the evidence in the case will warrant. In all such actions, writs of attachment may issue as in other cases.

Source:

S.L. 1951, ch. 233, § 2; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 47-1637.

47-16-38.
Surrender of lease by lessee.

Any oil and gas or mining lease that has been or may hereafter be recorded in the office of the recorder of any county may be discharged and canceled of record by the recording of a certificate of cancellation signed by the lessee or the lessee’s assigns of record, or the lessee’s duly authorized attorney in fact or personal representative, including a foreign executor or administrator, or a corporation or limited liability company by its duly authorized officers or managers surrendering all of the lessee’s right, title, and interest in and to said lease, which certificate shall be acknowledged as prescribed by law.

Source:

S.L. 1951, ch. 233, § 3; 1953, ch. 277, § 2; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 47-1638; S.L. 1993, ch. 54, § 106; 2001, ch. 120, § 1.

Collateral References.

Abandonment of oil or gas lease by parol declaration, 13 A.L.R.2d 951.

Rights of parties to oil and gas lease or royalty deed after expiration of fixed term where production temporarily ceases, 100 A.L.R.2d 885.

47-16-39.
Record of surrender.

The certificate of cancellation mentioned in section 47-16-38 shall be recorded at length and shall be noted on the margin of the record of the lease.

Source:

S.L. 1951, ch. 233, § 4; 1953, ch. 277, § 3; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 47-1639.

47-16-39.1.
Obligation to pay royalties — Breach.

The obligation arising under an oil and gas lease to pay oil or gas royalties to the mineral owner or the mineral owner’s assignee, to deliver oil or gas to a purchaser to the credit of the mineral owner or the mineral owner’s assignee, or to pay the market value thereof is of the essence in the lease contract, and breach of the obligation may constitute grounds for the cancellation of the lease in cases in which it is determined by the court that the equities of the case require cancellation. If the operator under an oil and gas lease fails to pay oil or gas royalties to the mineral owner or the mineral owner’s assignee within one hundred fifty days after oil or gas produced under the lease is marketed and cancellation of the lease is not sought or if the operator fails to pay oil or gas royalties to an unleased mineral interest owner within one hundred fifty days after oil or gas production is marketed from the unleased mineral interest owner’s mineral interest, the operator thereafter shall pay interest on the unpaid royalties, without the requirement that the mineral owner or the mineral owner’s assignee request the payment of interest, at the rate of eighteen percent per annum until paid. If the aggregate amount is less than fifty dollars, the operator may remit semiannually to a person entitled to royalties the aggregate of six months’ monthly royalties. The district court for the county in which the oil or gas well is located has jurisdiction over any proceeding brought under this section. The prevailing party in any proceeding brought under this section is entitled to recover court costs and reasonable attorney’s fees. This section does not apply if mineral owners or their assignees elect to take their proportionate share of production in kind, in the event of a dispute of title existing that would affect distribution of royalty payments, or if a mineral owner cannot be located after reasonable inquiry by the operator; however, the operator shall make royalty payments to those mineral owners whose title and ownership interest is not in dispute.

This section does not apply to obligations to pay oil and gas royalties under an oil and gas lease on minerals owned or managed by the board of university and school lands.

Source:

S.L. 1961, ch. 295, § 1; 1981, ch. 466, § 1; 1995, ch. 439, § 1; 2007, ch. 401, § 1; 2009, ch. 314, § 2; 2011, ch. 265, § 6; 2021, ch. 119, § 2, effective August 1, 2021.

47-16-39.2.
Inspection of production and royalty payment records — Penalty.

A royalty owner, a royalty owner’s assignee, or a designated representative, upon written notice, is entitled to inspect and copy the oil and gas production and royalty payment records for the lease of the person obligated to pay royalties under the lease or division order. The person obligated to pay royalties under the lease shall make that person’s oil and gas royalty payment and production records available for inspection and copying at that person’s usual and customary place of business within the United States. A royalty owner may bring an action to compel the person obligated to pay royalties to allow inspection and copying of oil and gas production royalty payment records. In order for the royalty owner to prevail in such an action, the royalty owner must establish that:

The royalty owner or the royalty owner’s assignee complied with notice requirements of this section;

The notice specified the lease involved, the time period under review and the records requested;

The royalty owner notified the person obligated to pay royalties at the address printed on the information statement as prescribed by rules adopted by the industrial commission pursuant to section 38-08-06.3; and

The person obligated to pay royalties denied inspection of the records or failed to respond within thirty days of service of notice.

The district court for the county in which the oil or gas well is located has jurisdiction over all proceedings brought pursuant to this section. If the royalty owner or the royalty owner’s assignee is successful in any proceeding brought pursuant to this section, the district court shall allow the royalty owner or the royalty owner’s assignee to recover court costs; reasonable costs, fees, disbursements, and expenses incurred by the royalty owner or the royalty owner’s assignee or a designated representative in inspecting and copying the oil and gas production and royalty payment records of the person obligated to pay royalties under the lease; and reasonable attorney’s fees.

If a royalty owner, a royalty owner’s assignee, or a designated representative is the board of university and school lands:

The records in subsection 1 must be sent electronically, or in a manner acceptable to the board, to a location designated by the board.

Notwithstanding subsection 2, at the discretion of the board, a proceeding brought under this section may be brought in the district court of Burleigh County or in the county in which the oil or gas well is located.

If the board of university and school lands is successful in any proceeding brought under this section, the district court shall allow the board to recover court costs; reasonable costs, fees, disbursements, and expenses incurred by the board in inspecting the copying the oil and gas production and royalty payment records of the person obligated to pay royalties under the lease; and reasonable attorney’s fees.

The district court also shall assess a civil penalty of two thousand dollars per day for each day the person obligated to pay royalties under the lease failed to send the oil and gas royalty payment and production records to the board in accordance with subsection 1.

The civil penalty under subdivision a ceases to accrue on the date the proceedings are initiated under subsection 1.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 553, § 1; 2019, ch. 380, § 1, effective August 1, 2019.

47-16-39.3.
Division orders — Definition, function, and operation.

A division order is an instrument executed by the operator, the royalty owners, and any other person having an interest in the production directing the purchaser of oil or gas to pay for the products taken in the proportions set out in the instrument. Royalty payments may not be withheld because an interest owner has not executed a division order. A division order may not alter or amend the terms of the oil and gas lease. A division order that varies the terms of the oil and gas lease is invalid to the extent of the variance and the terms of the oil and gas lease take precedence.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 554, § 1.

47-16-39.4.
Resolution of spacing unit ownership interest disputes.

If the mineral owner and mineral developer disagree over the mineral owner’s ownership interest in a spacing unit, the mineral developer shall furnish the mineral owner with a description of the conflict and the proposed resolution or with that portion of the title opinion that concerns the disputed interest.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 280, § 2.

Effective Date.

This section became effective August 1, 2013.

47-16-40.
Record of lease as notice for definite term — Extension upon contingency — Affidavit.

When an oil, gas, or mineral lease is hereafter given on land situated within the state of North Dakota, the recording thereof in the office of the recorder of the county in which the land is located shall impart notice to the public of the validity and continuance of said lease for the definite term therein expressed, but no longer. If such lease contains the statement of any contingency upon the happening of which the term of any such lease may be extended, such as, and as much longer as oil and gas or either are produced in paying quantities, the owner of said lease may at any time before the expiration of the definite term of said lease file with said recorder an affidavit setting forth the description of the lease, that the affiant is the owner thereof and the facts showing that the required contingency has happened. This affidavit shall be recorded in full by the recorder, and such record together with that of the lease shall be due notice to the public of the existence and continuing validity of said lease, until the same shall be forfeited, canceled, set aside, or surrendered according to law.

Source:

S.L. 1951, ch. 233, § 5; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 47-1640; S.L. 2001, ch. 120, § 1.

47-16-41.
Demand for release before bringing action — Evidence.

At least twenty days before bringing the action provided for in section 47-16-37, the owner of the leased land, either personally or by the owner’s agent or attorney, shall demand of the holder of the lease, if such demand by ordinary diligence can be made in this state, that said lease be released of record. Such demand may be either written or oral. When written, a carbon or written copy thereof, when shown to be such, may be used as evidence in any court with the same force and effect as the original.

Source:

S.L. 1951, ch. 233, § 6; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 47-1641.

47-16-42.
Wind energy leases — Termination. [Renumbered]

Redesignated as section 17-04-05 under S.L. 2007, ch. 204, § 5.

Note.

This section has been redesignated as section 17-04-05 pursuant to S.L. 2007, ch. 204, § 5.